Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 39.10.330 and 2023 c 395 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Contracts for design-build services shall be awarded through a competitive process using public solicitation of proposals for design-build services. At a minimum, the public body shall publish at least once in a legal newspaper of general circulation published in, or as near as possible to, that part of the county in which the public work will be done, a notice of its request for qualifications from proposers for design-build services, and the availability and location of the request for proposal documents. The public body is encouraged to post the design-build opportunity in additional areas, such as websites for business associations or the office of minority and women's business enterprises, to further publicize the opportunity for qualified design-build teams. The request for qualifications documents shall include:(a) A description of the project including the estimated design-build contract value and the intended use of the project;(b) The reasons for using the design-build procedure;(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of the proposer;(d) A description of the process the public body will use to evaluate qualifications and finalists' proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors and any specific forms to be used by the proposers;(i) Evaluation factors for qualifications shall include technical qualifications, such as specialized experience and technical competence of the firms and the key design and construction personnel; capacity to perform; the proposer's past performance in utilization of business entities certified with the office of minority and women's business enterprises, including small businesses and business entities certified with the department of veterans affairs, to the extent permitted by law; ability to provide a performance and payment bond for the project; and other appropriate factors. Cost or price-related factors are not permitted in the request for qualifications phase;(ii) Evaluation factors for finalists' proposals shall include the management plan to meet time and budget requirements and one or more price-related factors. Evaluation factors must include a proposer's inclusion plan for business entities certified with the office of minority and women's business enterprises, including small businesses and business entities certified with the department of veterans affairs as subconsultants, subcontractors, and suppliers for the project, to the extent permitted by law. Evaluation factors may also include, but not be limited to, the technical approach or the design concept;(e) Protest procedures including time limits for filing a protest, which in no event may limit the time to file a protest to fewer than four business days from the date the proposer was notified of the selection decision;(f) The proposed contract;(g) The honorarium to be paid to finalists submitting responsive proposals and who are not awarded a design-build contract;(h) The schedule for the procurement process and the project; and(i) Other information relevant to the project.(2) The public body shall establish an evaluation committee to evaluate the responses to the request for qualifications based solely on the factors, weighting, and process identified in the request for qualifications and any addenda issued by the public body. Based on the evaluation committee's findings, the public body shall select not more than five responsive and responsible finalists to submit proposals. The public body may, in its sole discretion, reject all proposals and shall provide its reasons for rejection in writing to all proposers.(3) The public body must notify all proposers of the finalists selected to move to the next phase of the selection process. The process may not proceed to the next phase until two business days after all proposers are notified of the committee's selection decision. At the request of a proposer not selected as a finalist, the public body must provide the requesting proposer with a scoring summary of the evaluation factors for its proposal. Proposers filing a protest on the selection of the finalists must file the protest in accordance with the published protest procedures. The selection process may not advance to the next phase of selection until two business days after the final protest decision is transmitted to the protestor.(4) Upon selection of the finalists, the public body shall issue a request for proposals to the finalists. The request for proposal documents shall include:(a) Any specific forms to be used by the finalists; and(b) Submission of a summary of the finalist's accident prevention program and an overview of its implementation.(5) The public body shall establish an evaluation committee to evaluate the proposals submitted by the finalists. The finalists' proposals shall be evaluated and scored based solely on the factors, weighting, and process identified in the request for qualifications, the request for proposals, and in any addenda published by the public body. Public bodies may request best and final proposals from finalists. The public body may initiate negotiations with the finalist submitting the highest scored proposal. If the public body is unable to execute a contract with the finalist submitting the highest scored proposal, negotiations with that finalist may be suspended or terminated and the public body may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored finalist. Public bodies shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a contract agreement is reached or the selection process is terminated.(6) The public body shall notify all finalists of the selection decision and make a selection summary of the final proposals available to all proposers within two business days of such notification. If the public body receives a timely written protest from a finalist firm, the public body may not execute a contract until two business days after the final protest decision is transmitted to the protestor. The protestor must submit its protest in accordance with the published protest procedures.(7) The firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and payment bond for the contracted amount before the start of construction and no later than 10 days upon request from the public body. A performance and payment bond is not required for the portion of the design-build contract that includes design services, preconstruction services, and other services that are not public works construction included in the contract.(8) Any contract must require the firm awarded the contract to track and report to the public body and to the office of minority and women's business enterprises its utilization of the office of minority and women's business enterprises certified businesses and veteran certified businesses.(9) The public body shall provide appropriate honorarium payments to finalists submitting responsive proposals that are not awarded a design-build contract. Honorarium payments shall be sufficient to generate meaningful competition among potential proposers on design-build projects. In determining the amount of the honorarium, the public body shall recognize the level of effort required to meet the selection criteria.Sec. 2. RCW 39.08.030 and 2018 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The bond mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 must be in an amount equal to the full contract price agreed to be paid for such work or improvement, except under subsection (2) of this section, and must be to the state of Washington, except as otherwise provided in RCW 39.08.100, and except in cases of cities, towns, public transportation benefit areas, passenger-only ferry service districts, and water-sewer districts, in which cases such municipalities may by general ordinance or resolution fix and determine the amount of such bond and to whom such bond runs. However, the same may not be for a less amount than ((twenty-five))25 percent of the contract price of any such improvement for cities, towns, public transportation benefit areas, and passenger-only ferry service districts, and not less than the full contract price of any such improvement for water-sewer districts, and may designate that the same must be payable to such city, town, water-sewer district, public transportation benefit area, or passenger-only ferry service district, and not to the state of Washington, and all such persons mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 have a right of action in his, her, or their own name or names on such bond for work done by such laborers or mechanics, and for materials furnished or provisions and goods supplied and furnished in the prosecution of such work, or the making of such improvements, and the state has a right of action for the collection of taxes, increases, and penalties specified in RCW 39.08.010: PROVIDED, That, except for the state with respect to claims for taxes, increases, and penalties specified in RCW 39.08.010, such persons do not have any right of action on such bond for any sum whatever, unless within ((thirty))30 days from and after the completion of the contract with an acceptance of the work by the affirmative action of the board, council, commission, trustees, officer, or body acting for the state, county or municipality, or other public body, city, town or district, the laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or material supplier, or person claiming to have supplied materials, provisions or goods for the prosecution of such work, or the making of such improvement, must present to and file with such board, council, commission, trustees or body acting for the state, county or municipality, or other public body, city, town or district, a notice in writing in substance as follows:To (here insert the name of the state, county or municipality or other public body, city, town or district):Notice is hereby given that the undersigned (here insert the name of the laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or material supplier, or person claiming to have furnished labor, materials or provisions for or upon such contract or work) has a claim in the sum of .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . dollars (here insert the amount) against the bond taken from .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . (here insert the name of the principal and surety or sureties upon such bond) for the work of .Â .Â .Â .Â .Â . (here insert a brief mention or description of the work concerning which said bond was taken).Â (here to be signed). . . .(b) Such notice must be signed by the person or corporation making the claim or giving the notice, and the notice, after being presented and filed, is a public record open to inspection by any person, and in any suit or action brought against such surety or sureties by any such person or corporation to recover for any of the items specified in this section, the claimant is entitled to recover in addition to all other costs, attorneys' fees in such sum as the court adjudges reasonable. However, attorneys' fees are not allowed in any suit or action brought or instituted before the expiration of thirty days following the date of filing of the notice as provided in this section. However, any city may avail itself of the provisions of RCW 39.08.010 ((through)), 39.08.015, and 39.08.030, notwithstanding any charter provisions in conflict with this section. Moreover, any city or town may impose any other or further conditions and obligations in such bond as may be deemed necessary for its proper protection in the fulfillment of the terms of the contract secured thereby, and not in conflict with this section. The ((thirty))30-day notice requirement under this subsection does not apply to claims made by the state for taxes, increases, and penalties specified in RCW 39.08.010.(2) Under the job order contracting procedure described in RCW 39.10.420, bonds will be in an amount not less than the dollar value of all open work orders. Under the design-build procedure described in RCW 39.10.330, bonds will be in an amount not less than the dollar value of the contracted amount of the construction portion of the contract. A performance and payment bond is not required for the portion of the design-build contract that includes design services, preconstruction services, and other services that are not public works construction included in the contract.(3) Where retainage is not withheld pursuant to RCW 60.28.011(1)(b), upon final acceptance of the public works project, the state, county, municipality, or other public body must within thirty days notify the department of revenue, the employment security department, and the department of labor and industries of the completion of contracts over ((thirty-five thousand dollars))$35,000.--- END ---